Mississippi, session 2026, HB1444.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Mississippi Department of Corrections shall maintain written policies and procedures for providing appropriate personal protective equipment to inmates handling cleaning chemicals and supplies. SECTION 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.